Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4509
Long-term care insurance, defined.

Long-term care insurance shall mean any insurance policy or rider advertised, marketed, offered, or designed to provide coverage for not less than twelve consecutive months for each covered person on an expense-incurred, indemnity, prepaid, or other basis for one or more necessary or medically necessary diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, rehabilitative, maintenance, or personal care services provided in a setting other than an acute care unit of a hospital. Long-term care insurance shall include group and individual annuities and life insurance policies or riders which provide directly or which supplement long-term care insurance. Long-term care insurance shall also include a policy or rider which provides for payment of benefits based upon cognitive impairment or the loss of functional capacity. Long-term care insurance may be issued by insurers, fraternal benefit societies, prepaid health plans, health maintenance organizations, or any similar organizations to the extent they are otherwise authorized to issue life or health insurance. Long-term care insurance shall not include any insurance policy which is offered primarily to provide medicare supplement coverage, basic hospital expense coverage, basic medical-surgical expense coverage, hospital confinement indemnity coverage, major medical expense coverage, disability income or related asset-protection coverage, accident-only coverage, specified disease or specified accident coverage, or limited-benefit health coverage. Long-term care insurance shall not include life insurance policies which accelerate the death benefit specifically for one or more of the qualifying events of terminal illness, medical conditions requiring extraordinary medical intervention, or permanent institutional confinement and which provide the option of a lump-sum payment for those benefits and in which neither the benefits nor the eligibility for the benefits is conditioned upon the receipt of long-term care.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 271;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 46.